Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 9

State Office Buildings and Support Facilities Revolving Fund

9-4-901. Created.

There is hereby created within the general fund a special account to be known as the “state office buildings and support facilities revolving fund.”

Acts 1993, ch. 332, § 1.

9-4-902. Unencumbered funds and unexpended balance.

Any unencumbered funds and any unexpended balance of the fund remaining at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall be carried forward until expended in accordance with this part.

Acts 1993, ch. 332, § 1.

9-4-903. Interest.

Interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund shall be returned to the fund and remain a part of the fund.

Acts 1993, ch. 332, § 1.

9-4-904. Investments — Administration of fund.

Moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer for the benefit of the fund pursuant to §9-4-603. The fund shall be administered by the commissioner of general services in accordance with policy established by the state building commission.

Acts 1993, ch. 332, § 1; 2013, ch. 454, § 38.

9-4-905. Purpose of fund.

The state office buildings and support facilities revolving fund is to provide for:

Operating expenses for office buildings and support facilities;

Debt service payments on general obligation bonds authorized to build or acquire office buildings and support facilities;

Routine maintenance expenditures on office buildings and support facilities;

Major maintenance and renovation projects for office buildings and support facilities as approved by the state building commission;

Relocation expenses for state agencies;

Payments for leased space occupied by state agencies; and

Payments to build or acquire buildings or support facilities as approved by the state building commission.

Acts 1993, ch. 332, § 1.

9-4-906. Deposits.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, there shall be deposited in the fund any and all appropriations made either in the general appropriations act, including any rents for leased state facilities covered by the fund, or in any other act which is for the purpose of funding the items listed in §9-4-905.

Acts 1993, ch. 332, § 1.

9-4-907. Lease payments.

Lease payments for space occupied by state agencies, including the legislative and judicial branches, shall be established by policy issued by the commissioner of general services and approved by the state building commission; provided, however, that until such time as a policy shall be issued by the commissioner of general services and approved by the state building commission, the policy formerly issued by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the state building commission shall remain effective. The lease payments shall be paid to the fund.

Acts 1993, ch. 332, § 1; 2013, ch. 454, § 39.